Utah statutes.
49-12-406.   Part-time elective or appointive service -- Computation of allowance.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this title, elective or appointive service rendered on a basis not considered full time by the office, unless otherwise provided by this chapter, shall have a separate allowance computed on the basis of compensation actually received by the member during the period of elective or appointive service.

